Alaska statutes. Title 5. Amusements and Sports.
Chapter 20. Recreational Devices.

Administrative Code. —

For amusement rides, see 8 AAC 78, art. 1.

Sec. 05.20.010.
Owners or operators to provide safe equipment.

An owner or operator of a device as defined in AS

05.20.120

shall construct, furnish, maintain, and provide safe and adequate facilities and equipment with which to safely and properly receive and carry all persons offered to and received by the owner or operator of the device, and to promote the safety of the patrons, employees, and the public.
The owner or operator of ski equipment and devices is not considered a common carrier.

History.

(§ 1 ch 109 SLA 1960; am § 1 ch 25 SLA 1967)

Administrative Code. —

For amusement rides, see 8 AAC 78, art. 1.

Collateral references. —

Entertainment and Amusement; Sports, § 120.

27A Am. Jur. 2d, Entertainment and Sports Law, §§ 87, 90-93, 103.

Liability for loss of hat, coat or other property deposited by patron of place of amusement. 1 ALR2d 815.

Exclusion of person (for reason other than color or race) from place of public entertainment or amusement. 1 ALR2d 1165.

Liability to patron of public amusement for accidental injury from cause other than assault, hazards of game or amusement, or condition of premises. 16 ALR2d 912.

Liability of proprietor for injury to customer or patron caused by pushing, crowding, etc., of other patrons. 20 ALR2d 8.

Liability of amusement operator for a personal assault by employee upon customer, patron, or other invitee. 34 ALR2d 422.

Maintenance of auditorium, community recreational center, building, or the like, by municipal corporation as governmental or proprietary function for purposes of tort liability. 47 ALR2d 544.

Proximate cause of injury to patron using stairway or steps in theater or other place of amusement. 55 ALR2d 866.

Liability to patron of scenic railway, roller coaster, or miniature railway. 66 ALR2d 689.

Proximate cause of injury from amusement device in form of slide or chute. 69 ALR2d 1075.

Liability for injury to one on or near merry-go-round. 75 ALR2d 792.

Liability of proprietor of store, business, or place of amusement for injury to one using baby stroller, shopping cart, or the like, furnished by defendant. 76 ALR2d 1342; 42 ALR5th 159.

Liability of owner, lessee, or operator for injury or death on or near loop-o-plane, ferris wheel, miniature car, or similar rides. 86 ALR2d 350.

Liability of owner or operator of theater or other place of amusement to patron injured by condition or defect in lavatory, rest room, or toilet facilities. 88 ALR2d 1090.

Proximate cause as affecting liability of operator of skiing, tobagganing, or bobsledding facilities for injury to patron or participant. 94 ALR2d 1434; 95 A.L.R.3d 203.

Validity, construction, and effect of agreement exempting operator of amusement facility from liability for personal injury or death of patron. 8 ALR3d 1393.

Liability of owner or operator for injury to patron of fair, carnival, or the like, from operation of sideshows, games, or similar concessions. 24 ALR3d 945.

Accidents involving negligence in operation of snowmobile, skimobile, or similar vehicle. 42 ALR3d 1422.

Liability of business establishments, places of accommodation or recreation, and like, for injury or damage occurring on the premises caused by the accidental starting up of parked motor vehicle. 43 ALR3d 952.

Liability of owner or operator of theatre or other amusement to patron assaulted by another patron. 75 ALR3d 441.

Liability of owner or operator of boat livery for injury to patron. 94 ALR3d 876.

Liability of theater owner or operator for injury to or death of patron resulting from lighting conditions on premises. 19 ALR4th 1110.

Exclusion of one sex from admission to or enjoyment of equal privileges in places of accommodation or entertainment as actionable sex discrimination under state law. 38 ALR4th 339.

Liability for injury to customer or patron from amusement device maintained by store or shopping center for use by customers. 40 ALR5th 807.

Sec. 05.20.012.
Liability for accidents in skiing areas. [Repealed, § 4 ch 80 SLA 1980. For current law, see AS 05.45.]

Sec. 05.20.020.
Department of Labor and Workforce Development to inspect devices.

The Department of Labor and Workforce Development is responsible for the inspection of devices.

History.

(§ 2 ch 109 SLA 1960; am E.O. No. 49, § 2 (1981))

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1999, “Department of Labor” was changed to “Department of Labor and Workforce Development” in accordance with § 90, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

Administrative Code. —

For amusement rides, see 8 AAC 78, art. 1.

For tramways, see 8 AAC 78, art. 2.

Sec. 05.20.030.
Powers and duties of department.

The department has the following powers and duties:

whenever the department, after hearing called upon its own motion or upon complaint, finds that additional apparatus, equipment, facilities, or devices for use or in connection with a device should reasonably be provided, or repairs or improvements to, or changes in, a device in use should reasonably be made, or additions or changes in construction should reasonably be made, in order to promote the security and safety of the public or employees, it may make and serve an order directing the repairs, improvements, changes, or additions to be made;

if the department finds that the equipment, appliances, apparatus, or other structures of the device are defective, and that the operation of the device is dangerous to the employees of the owner or operator of it or to the public, it shall immediately give notice to the owner or operator of the repairs or reconstruction necessary to place the device in a safe condition, and may prescribe the time within which they shall be made; if, in its opinion, it is necessary or proper, the department may prohibit the operation of the device until the device is repaired and placed in a safe condition.

History.

(§ 2 ch 109 SLA 1960)

Administrative Code. —

For amusement rides, see 8 AAC 78, art. 1.

For tramways, see 8 AAC 78, art. 2.

Sec. 05.20.040.
Personnel to inspect devices.

The department shall designate a person qualified in experience and training as the inspector of devices.
The department may employ additional employees as are necessary to administer this chapter.
The inspector and the employees may be hired on a temporary basis or borrowed from other state departments or political subdivisions of the state, or the department may contract with individuals or firms for the inspecting service on an independent basis.
The department shall prescribe the salary or other remuneration for this service. Contracting under this section is governed by AS 36.30 (State Procurement Code).

History.

(§ 3 ch 109 SLA 1960; am § 4 ch 106 SLA 1986)

Administrative Code. —

For amusement rides, see 8 AAC 78, art. 1.

For tramways, see 8 AAC 78, art. 2.

Sec. 05.20.050.
Duties of inspector; condemnation.

The inspector of devices and the inspector’s assistants shall inspect all equipment and appliances connected with devices and make reports of inspection to the department.
The inspector shall, on discovering defective equipment or appliances, making the use of the equipment dangerous, immediately report this to the owner or operator of the device, and to the department.
If in the opinion of the inspector the continued operation of the defective equipment constitutes an immediate danger to the safety of the persons operating or being conveyed by the equipment, the inspector may condemn the equipment and shall immediately notify the department of the action.

History.

(§ 4 ch 109 SLA 1960)

Administrative Code. —

For tramways, see 8 AAC 78, art. 2.

Sec. 05.20.060.
Annual inspections; fees.

The inspector of devices and the inspector’s assistants shall inspect each device at least once each year.

Upon inspection of a device under this section, the owner or operator of the device shall pay the department a fee of $200 for the inspection of that device. The department shall waive the inspection fee if the owner or operator of the device uses a private inspector who is certified by a national organization to inspect devices and provides the inspection report to the department.

Fees collected under this section shall be deposited in the building safety account created by AS

44.31.025

.

History.

(§ 4 ch 109 SLA 1960; am § 1 ch 87 SLA 2004)

Administrative Code. —

For amusement rides, see 8 AAC 78, art. 1.

For tramways, see 8 AAC 78, art. 2.

Legislative history reports. —

For governor’s transmittal letter for ch. 87, SLA 2004 (SB 278), adding subsections (b) and (c) to this section, see 2004 Senate Journal 1993 - 1994.

Sec. 05.20.070.
Regulations.

The department may adopt reasonable regulations and codes relating to public safety in the construction, operation, and maintenance of devices.
The regulations and codes must be in accordance with established standards, if any, and may not be discriminatory in their application.

History.

(§ 5 ch 109 SLA 1960)

Administrative Code. —

For amusement rides, see 8 AAC 78, art. 1.

For tramways, see 8 AAC 78, art. 2.

Sec. 05.20.080.
Application of Administrative Procedure Act.

The procedure for review of the orders or actions of the department, its agents, or employees, is the same as that contained in AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act). Administrative hearings on contested cases shall be conducted by the office of administrative hearings (AS

44.64.010

).

History.

(§ 8 ch 109 SLA 1960; am § 5 ch 163 SLA 2004)

Administrative Code. —

For amusement rides, see 8 AAC 78, art. 1.

For tramways, see 8 AAC 78, art. 2.

Sec. 05.20.090.
State not liable for injury or damage.

Inspections, regulations, and orders of the department do not impose liability upon the state for injury or damage resulting from the operation of the facilities regulated by this chapter. An action of the department and its personnel is an exercise of the police power of the state.

History.

(§ 7 ch 109 SLA 1960)

Sec. 05.20.100.
Authority of political subdivisions to regulate devices.

This chapter does not impair the authority or responsibility of a political subdivision with regard to the local enforcement of licensing, safety, or police regulations authorized by local ordinance or state law if the department determines that the standards employed by the political subdivision are at least equal to those adopted by the department.
The authority of a political subdivision for the licensing, safety, or police regulation of devices extends to a point five miles outside the territorial limits of the political subdivision if no other political subdivision of the state is exercising similar authority over the same devices.

History.

(§ 6 ch 109 SLA 1960)

Sec. 05.20.110.
Exclusion of transportation devices under jurisdiction of other agencies from chapter.

This chapter does not extend to the department or to political subdivisions authority to adopt regulations pertaining to transportation facilities or devices subject to the regulatory jurisdiction of other state or local agencies.

History.

(§ 9 ch 109 SLA 1960)

Sec. 05.20.120.
Definitions.

In this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires,

“department” means the Department of Labor and Workforce Development;

“device” means a device that is designed and operated for the conveyance or movement of persons and that is used as a source of or aids in the promoting of entertainment, pleasure, play, relaxation, or instruction, including but not limited to ski tows, roller coasters, merry-go-rounds, and Ferris wheels.

History.

(§§ 1, 2 ch 109 SLA 1960; am E.O. No. 49, § 3 (1981))

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1999, “Department of Labor” was changed to “Department of Labor and Workforce Development” in paragraph (1) in accordance with § 90, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

Administrative Code. —

For amusement rides, see 8 AAC 78, art. 1.